Wyoming, session 2025, HB0247.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
Section 1. W.S. 15-1-402(a)(intro), (v), (vi), by
creating a new paragraph (vii) and (e) and 15-1-409(b) and
(c) are amended to read:

15-1-402. Annexing territories; findings required;
when contiguity not deemed affected; annexation report;
landowner approval before annexation.

(a) Before any territory is eligible for annexation,
the governing body of any city or town at a hearing as
provided in W.S. 15-1-405 shall find that all of the
following:

(v) If the city or town does not own or operate
its own electric utility, its governing body is prepared to
issue one (1) or more franchises as necessary to serve the
annexed area pursuant to W.S. 15-1-410; and

(vi) The annexing city or town, not less than
twenty (20) business days prior to before the public
hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a), has sent by certified
mail to all landowners and affected public utilities within
the territory and by first class mail to any persons owning
HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
property that is adjacent to or within three hundred (300)
five hundred fifty (550) feet of the territory proposed to
be annexed, regardless of whether the property is inside or
outside the corporate limits of the annexing city or town
and regardless of whether the city or town is exercising
authority under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii), written notice
containing the following:

(A) A summary of the proposed annexation
report as required under subsection (c) of this section;

(B) Notice of the need to respond in
writing not later than five (5) days before the date of the
public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a) if the
landowner approves or opposes the proposed annexation
unless approval is not required under paragraph (vii) of
this subsection;

(C) Notice of the opportunity to request an
estimate of required infrastructure improvement costs under
subsection (e) of this section; and

HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
(D) Notice of the time, date and location
of the public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a).

(vii) Except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, not less than a majority of all landowners
owning a parcel of the area sought to be annexed, excluding
public streets, alleys and tax exempt property, have
approved in writing the proposed annexation by responding
to the written notice in paragraph (vi) of this subsection.
Failure to respond to the notice under paragraph (vi) of
this subsection as provided in subparagraph (vi)(B) of this
subsection shall be considered an approval of the proposed
annexation. This paragraph shall not apply if the area
sought to be annexed is entirely within the corporate
limits of the annexing city or town.

(e) Before any territory is eligible for annexation
the governing body shall prepare for each landowner and
affected public utility so requesting in writing, the
estimated cost of infrastructure improvements required of
the landowner and affected public utility related to the
annexation. The request shall be made to the clerk of the
annexing municipality not less than ten (10) days prior to
HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
the public hearing required by W.S. 15-1-405(a). The
estimate shall be provided to the landowner and affected
public utility prior to the hearing. The actual costs for
the infrastructure improvements shall not exceed the
estimated cost provided under this subsection by more than
four percent (4%). The actual costs for the infrastructure
improvements shall not exceed the estimated cost provided
under this subsection by more than four percent (4%).

15-1-409. Annexing territories; appeal;
determination; time for review; exclusiveness of appeal
remedy.

(b) If the court determines that the action taken was
capricious or arbitrary, or if it appears from the evidence
that the landowner's right in his property is being
unwarrantedly invaded or that the governing body abused its
discretion, the court shall declare the annexing ordinance
void. If the court determines the action of the governing
body was proper and valid, it shall sustain the ordinance.
The court shall declare the annexing ordinance void if the
court determines any of the following:

HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
(i) The action taken by the governing body was
capricious or arbitrary;

(ii) That the landowner's right in his property
is being unwarrantedly invaded;

(iii) That the governing body abused its
discretion;

(iv) That the governing body has failed to begin
providing services or make public improvements to the
annexed area within a reasonable time.

(c) All proceedings to review the findings and the
decisions of the governing body or actions to determine the
validity of the annexation ordinance pursuant to the
Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act shall be brought within
sixty (60) one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective
date of the annexation ordinance, and if not brought within
that time are forever barred.

Section 2. W.S. 15-1-411 is repealed.

HB0247

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0350
Section 3. This act applies to any proposed
annexation initiated on or after the effective date of this
act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0247